src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NIEJTEH !e plural noun
                    +N+Pl+Nom:h                       FINAL1    ;
                    +N+Pl+Nom:e%>h                    FINAL1    ;
                    +N+Pl+Acc:%>ide                   FINAL1    ;
                    +N+Pl+Gen:i                       FINAL1    ;
                    +N+Pl+Ill:%>ide                   FINAL1    ;
                    +N+Pl+Ine:%>ine                   FINAL1    ;
                    +N+Pl+Ela:%>ijste                 FINAL1    ;
                    +N+Pl+Com:i%>gujmie               FINAL1    ;
           +N+Pl+Com+Err/Orth:i%>gyjmie               FINAL1    ;
                       +N+Ess:%>ine                   FINAL1    ;
                 +N+Cmp/SgNom:e                       R         ;
                 +N+Cmp/PlGen:i                       R         ;
       +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl:%^aLATUS%»tj            N_ODD_PL  ;
          +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N:%^aLATUS%»tj            N_ODD_ESS ;
+N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Cmp/SgNom:%^aLATUS%»tje           R         ;
+N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Cmp/PlGen:%^aLATUS%»tj%>%^DISIMPi R         ;
 
 
LEXICON TJÅENIEH !ie plural noun
                    +N+Pl+Nom:ieh                    FINAL1    ;
                    +N+Pl+Acc:ide                    FINAL1    ;
                    +N+Pl+Gen:iej                    FINAL1    ;
                    +N+Pl+Ill:ide                    FINAL1    ;
                    +N+Pl+Ine:ine                    FINAL1    ;
                    +N+Pl+Ela:ijste                  FINAL1    ;
                    +N+Pl+Com:i%>gujmie              FINAL1    ;
            +N+Pl+Com+Err/Orth:i%>gyjmie              FINAL1    ;
                       +N+Ess:ine                    FINAL1    ;
                  +N+Cmp/SgNom:ie                     R         ;
                  +N+Cmp/PlGen:iej                    R         ;
                  
       +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl:%^aLATUS%»tj            N_ODD_PL  ;
          +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N:%^aLATUS%»tj            N_ODD_ESS ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Cmp/SgNom:%^aLATUS%»tje           R         ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Cmp/PlGen:%^aLATUS%»tj%>%^DISIMPi R         ;
 
 
LEXICON GAAROEH !oe plural noun
                    +N+Pl+Nom:oeh                    FINAL1    ;
                    +N+Pl+Acc:ojde                   FINAL1    ;
                    +N+Pl+Gen:oej                    FINAL1    ;
                    +N+Pl+Ill:ojde                   FINAL1    ;
                    +N+Pl+Ine:ojne                   FINAL1    ;
                    +N+Pl+Ela:ojste                  FINAL1    ;
                    +N+Pl+Com:oej%>gujmie            FINAL1    ;
            +N+Pl+Com+Err/Orth:oej%>gyjmie            FINAL1    ;
                       +N+Ess:ojne                   FINAL1    ;
                  +N+Cmp/SgNom:oe                     R         ;
                  +N+Cmp/PlGen:oej                    R         ;
                  
       +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl:%^aLATUS%»tj            N_ODD_PL  ;
          +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N:%^aLATUS%»tj            N_ODD_ESS ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Cmp/SgNom:%^aLATUS%»tje           R         ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Cmp/PlGen:%^aLATUS%»tj%>%^DISIMPi R         ;



! Inflection for nïejte-type nouns
! --------------------------------

LEXICON IJVE ! Until abessive / abessijve is decided...
                +N:ijv X_NIEJTE ;
        +N+Err/Orth:ïjv X_NIEJTE ;
        +N+Err/Orth:iv  X_NIEJTE ;
 +N+Cmp/SgNom+Use/NG:iv  R      ;


LEXICON IHKE_LOAN
                 :ihk IHKELES ; ! Divvun suggestion to SGM +Test/LysI+Test/HK
 +Err/Orth:ïhk IHKELES ; ! +Test/MørkI+Test/HK
  +Err/Orth:igk IHKELES ; ! +Test/LysI+Test/GK
 +Err/Orth:ïgk IHKELES ; ! +Test/MørkI+Test/GK 
  +Err/Orth:ijk IHKELES ; ! +Test/LysI+Test/JK
 +Err/Orth:ïjk IHKELES ; ! +Test/MørkI+Test/JK
               +N+Cmp/SgNom+Dial/-SW+Use/NG:ikk R       ; !NOR
              +N+Cmp/SgNom+Dial/-NOR+Use/NG:ik  R       ; !SW

LEXICON HTE_LOAN
                   +N:ht X_NIEJTE ;
    +N+Err/Orth:dt X_NIEJTE ;
    +N+Err/Orth:tt X_NIEJTE ;
 +N+Cmp/SgNom+Use/NG:tt R      ;

LEXICON UHTE/IHTE_LOAN
                     +N:ht X_NIEJTE ;
     +N+Err/Orth:dt X_NIEJTE ;
     +N+Err/Orth:tt X_NIEJTE ;
  +N+Cmp/SgNom+Dial/-SW+Use/NG:tt R      ; !NOR
 +N+Cmp/SgNom+Dial/-NOR+Use/NG:t  R      ; !SW


LEXICON NET_LOAN
                   +N:ht X_NIEJTE ;
          +N+Err/Orth:dt X_NIEJTE ;
          +N+Err/Orth:tt X_NIEJTE ;
  +N+Cmp/SgNom+Use/NG:t  R      ;

LEXICON ISME_LOAN
                 +N:ism X_NIEJTE ;! +Test/LysI
        +N+Err/Orth:ïsm X_NIEJTE ;!+Test/MørkI
         +N+Cmp/SgNom+Use/NG:ism R      ;

LEXICON IJISME_LOAN
              +N:jism X_NIEJTE ;!  +Test/LysI
+N+Err/Orth:jïsm X_NIEJTE ; ! +Test/MørkI
              +N:^ism X_NIEJTE ;!  +Test/LysI
+N+Err/Orth:^ïsm X_NIEJTE ;!  +Test/MørkI
         +N+Cmp/SgNom+Use/NG:^ism R      ;

LEXICON HISTOVRIJE_LOAN
                         :vrij IJE_ODD ;
+N+Sem/Dummytag+Cmp/SgNom:ria R ;
+N+Sem/Dummytag+Cmp/SgNom:rie R ;

LEXICON IJE_LOAN
          +N+Sg:ij NIEJTESGNOM ; ! Test/LysI
           +N+Sg:ij NIEJTESGOBL ; !Test/LysI
           +N+Pl:ij NIEJTE_PL   ; !+Test/LysI
              +N:ij NIEJTEREST  ; !Test/LysI

 +N+Sg+Err/Orth:ïj NIEJTESGNOM ; !Test/MørkI
 +N+Sg+Err/Orth:ïj NIEJTESGOBL ; !+Test/MørkI
 +N+Pl+Err/Orth:ïj NIEJTE_PL   ;! +Test/MørkI
    +N+Err/Orth:ïj NIEJTEREST  ; !+Test/MørkI

       +N+Cmp/SgNom+Use/NG:i  R      ;

LEXICON IJNE_LOAN
                +N:ijn X_NIEJTE ; ! +Test/LysI
       +N+Err/Orth:ïjn X_NIEJTE ; ! +Test/MørkI
         +N+Cmp/SgNom+Use/NG:in  R      ;

LEXICON IHKELES
             NIEJTE ;
 +N+Der/les:el LES    ;

LEXICON SJOVNE_LOAN
                      :sjovn IHKELES ;
  +N+Cmp/SgNom+Dial/-SW+Use/NG:sjons R       ; !NOR
 +N+Cmp/SgNom+Dial/-NOR+Use/NG:tions R       ; !SW


LEXICON SJOVNE2_LOAN
                      :sjovn  IHKELES ;
  +N+Cmp/SgNom+Dial/-SW+Use/NG:sjons  R       ; !NOR
 +N+Cmp/SgNom+Dial/-NOR+Use/NG:ssions R       ; !SW

LEXICON SJOVNE3_LOAN
                      :sjovn IHKELES ;
  +N+Cmp/SgNom+Dial/-SW+Use/NG:sjons R       ; !NOR
 +N+Cmp/SgNom+Dial/-NOR+Use/NG:sions R       ; !SW

LEXICON IJOVNE_LOAN
           +N+Err/Orth:^ovn X_NIEJTE ;
                  +N:jovn X_NIEJTE ;
 +N+Cmp/SgNom+Use/NG:^on  R      ;

LEXICON IJOVTE_LOAN
           +N+Err/Orth:^ovt X_NIEJTE ;
                   +N:jovt X_NIEJTE ;
 +N+Cmp/SgNom+Use/NG:^ot  R      ;

LEXICON IJOVRE_LOAN
          +N+Err/Orth:^ovr X_NIEJTE ;
                 +N:jovr X_NIEJTE ;
 +N+Cmp/SgNom+Use/NG:^or  R      ;

LEXICON IJOVSE_LOAN
              +N+Err/Orth:^ovs X_NIEJTE ;
                     +N:jovs X_NIEJTE ;
 +N+Cmp/SgNom+Dial/-NOR+Use/NG:^os  R      ;
  +N+Cmp/SgNom+Dial/-SW+Use/NG:^ose R      ;

LEXICON OVNE_LOAN
                   :ovn IHKELES ;
 +N+Cmp/SgNom+Use/NG:on  R       ;

LEXICON UVRE_LOAN
                  +N:vr   X_NIEJTE ; ! A-duvre, kantovre
           +N+Err/Orth:r    X_NIEJTE ; ! A-dure, kantore
                   :vrel LES    ; ! vet ikke om denne skal ha les
 +N+Cmp/SgNom+Use/NG:r    R      ; ! enklare med NG her.

LEXICON IJEENE_LOAN
         +N+Err/Orth:^een X_NIEJTE ;
         +N+Err/Orth:^en  X_NIEJTE ;
         +N+Err/Orth:jen  X_NIEJTE ;
                   +N:jeen X_NIEJTE ;
 +N+Cmp/SgNom+Use/NG:^en  R      ;


LEXICON IJENTE_LOAN
          +N+Err/Orth:^ent  X_NIEJTE ;
          +N+Err/Orth:^eent X_NIEJTE ;
                   +N:jeent X_NIEJTE ;
          +N+Err/Orth:jent  X_NIEJTE ;
 +N+Cmp/SgNom+Use/NG:^ent  R      ;

LEXICON IJANSE_LOAN
          +N+Err/Orth:^ans  X_NIEJTE ;
          +N+Err/Orth:^aans X_NIEJTE ;
                   +N:jaans X_NIEJTE ;
          +N+Err/Orth:jans  X_NIEJTE ;
 +N+Cmp/SgNom+Use/NG:^ans  R      ;


LEXICON IJANTE_LOAN
         +N+Err/Orth:^ant  X_NIEJTE ;
         +N+Err/Orth:^aant X_NIEJTE ;
                   +N:jaant X_NIEJTE ;
          +N+Err/Orth:jant  X_NIEJTE ;
 +N+Cmp/SgNom+Use/NG:^ant  R      ;
