src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounPx ! 
ateisme+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:ate IJISME_LOAN ;
bahaisme+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:baha IJISME_LOAN ;
nipkemesvaarjoeh+Sem/Dummytag:nipkemes#vaarj GAAROEH ;
bulimipasijeente+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:bulimi#pasi IJENTE_LOAN ;
daatamasjijne+Err/Orth+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:daata#mask IJNE_LOAN ;
deskriptijve+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:de^skript IJVE ;
diakrovne+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:dia^kr OVNE_LOAN ;
splåenhkieh+Sem/Dummytag:splåenhk TJÅENIEH ;
emisjovne+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:emi SJOVNE2_LOAN ;
emulsjovne+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:emul SJOVNE3_LOAN ;
ereksjovne+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:erek SJOVNE_LOAN ;
etnisisme+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:etnis ISME_LOAN ;
fonologije+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:fonolog IJE_LOAN ;
fotohistovrije+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:foto#histo HISTOVRIJE_LOAN ;
heartoeh+Sem/Dummytag:heart GAAROEH ; 
geopolitihke+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:geopolit IHKE_LOAN ;
grenadijne+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:grenad IJNE_LOAN ;
hygijeene+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:hygi IJEENE_LOAN ;
idijovte+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:idi IJOVTE_LOAN ;
imperatijve+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:imperat IJVE ;
induktovre+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:indukto UVRE_LOAN ;
internehte+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:interne HTE_LOAN ;
junijovre+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:juni IJOVRE_LOAN ;
karbovne+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:karb OVNE_LOAN ;
katijovne+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:kati IJOVNE_LOAN ;
komedijaante+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:komedi IJANTE_LOAN ;
konvoluhte+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:konvolu UHTE/IHTE_LOAN ;
kosmopolihte+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:kosmopoli UHTE/IHTE_LOAN ;
kriminalhistovrije+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:kriminal#histo HISTOVRIJE_LOAN ;
krimmieh+Sem/Dummytag:krimm TJÅENIEH ;
kultuvrekollisjovne+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:kultuvre#kolli SJOVNE2_LOAN ;
kvadrupelallijaanse+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:kvadrupel#alli IJANSE_LOAN ;
kvosijeente+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:kvosi IJENTE_LOAN ;
linearisasjovne+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:linearisa SJOVNE_LOAN ;
maskinfabrihke+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:maskin#fabr IHKE_LOAN ;
mekanisme+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:mekan ISME_LOAN ;
mesallijaanse+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:mes#alli IJANSE_LOAN ;
mammuhte+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:mammu UHTE/IHTE_LOAN ;
narkomanije+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:narkoman IJE_LOAN ;
navigatovre+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:navigato UVRE_LOAN ;
opinijovne+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:opin^i IJOVNE_LOAN ;
panteisme+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:pante IJISME_LOAN ;
pensjovne+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:pen SJOVNE3_LOAN ;
pepsijne+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:peps IJNE_LOAN ;
perspektijve+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:per^spekt IJVE ;
playstatione+Err/Orth+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:play#stati OVNE_LOAN ;
provijaante+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:provi IJANTE_LOAN ;
regresjovne+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:re^gre SJOVNE2_LOAN ;
senijovre+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:seni IJOVRE_LOAN ;
sfragistihke+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:sfragist IHKE_LOAN ;
sjampijovne+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Err/Orth+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:champi IJOVNE_LOAN ;
saaroeh+Sem/Dummytag:saar GAAROEH ; 
skuvlenehte+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:skuvle#ne HTE_LOAN ;
sosialklijeente+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:sosial#kli IJENTE_LOAN ;
spekulasjovne+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:spekula SJOVNE_LOAN ;
tjeapahlihtseh+Sem/Dummytag:tjeapah#lihts NIEJTEH ;
åajvahsaernieh+Sem/Dummytag:åajvahsaern TJÅENIEH ;
vuelehksskåaveh+Sem/Dummytag:vuelehks#skåav NIEJTEH ;
birnjeh+Sem/Dummytag:birnj NIEJTEH ;
symbijovse+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:symbi IJOVSE_LOAN ;
teaterhistovrije+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:te^ater#histo HISTOVRIJE_LOAN ;
televisjovne+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:televi SJOVNE3_LOAN ;
trippelallijaanse+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:trippel#alli IJANSE_LOAN ;
turistkontovre+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:turist#konto UVRE_LOAN ;
utilitarisme+Sem/Dummytag:utilitar ISME_LOAN ;
vibrijovse+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:vibri IJOVSE_LOAN ;
ööhpehtimmienehte+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:ööhpehtimmie#ne HTE_LOAN ;
kåserije+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:kåser IJE_LOAN ;
